Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4304
Stamps, labels, or other indicia; purchase; Tax Commissioner; duties.

(1) Subject to the rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner, official stamps, labels, or other indicia to be affixed to all marijuana and controlled substances shall be purchased from the Department of Revenue. The purchaser shall pay one hundred percent of face value for each official stamp, label, or other indicium purchased and shall not be required to give his or her name, address, social security number, or other identifying information.

(2) The Tax Commissioner shall adopt a uniform system of providing, affixing, and displaying an official stamp, label, or other indicium for marijuana and controlled substances on which a tax is imposed. Official stamps, labels, or other indicia shall expire six months from the date of issuance.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 4.